Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.065

State organic program—Authority of department and director—Rules.

(1) The department is authorized to take such actions, conduct proceedings, and enter orders as permitted or contemplated for a state organic program or certifying agent under the national organic program.

(2) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a certification provided for in this chapter if the director determines that an applicant or certified person has violated this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(3) The program shall not be inconsistent with the requirements of the national organic program.

(4) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

[ 2010 c 109 s 5; 2002 c 220 s 7.]